Illinois, session 104th, HB3905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $1,432,900, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated to the State Police Merit 7Board from the State Police Merit Board Public Safety Fund for 8its ordinary and contingent expenses. 9    Section 10. The amount of $3,500,000, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated to the State Police Merit 11Board from the State Police Merit Board Public Safety Fund for 12all costs associated with a cadet program for the Illinois 13State Police. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152025.